Florida, session 2026, HB839.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Present subsection (4) of section 471.033,
Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (5), and a new
subsection (4) is added to that section, to read:
471.033 Disciplinary proceedings.—
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (3), a person who violates
this section by engaging in the unlicensed practice of
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb839-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 839 2026
engineering, upon a second or subsequent violation, is subject
to a fine imposed by the department which increases as follows:
(a) For a second violation, a fine of $10,000.
(b) For a third violation, a fine of $15,000.
(c) For a fourth violation, a fine of $20,000.
(d) For a fifth and any subsequent violation, a fine of
$25,000.
Section 2. Section 471.056, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
471.056 Engineering Student Loan Assistance Program.—
(1) To encourage qualified candidates to seek employment
in areas of this state in which critical engineering shortages
exist, there is established the Engineering Student Loan
Assistance Program. The Florida Engineers Management Corporation
established in s. 471.038 shall manage the program. The primary
purpose of the program is to increase employment and retention
of licensed engineers who work for a state agency or water
management district by making payments toward loans received by
students from federal or state programs or commercial lending
institutions for the support of postsecondary study in
accredited or approved engineering programs.
(2) To be eligible for the program, a candidate must have
graduated from an accredited or approved engineering program and
have received a Florida license as a professional engineer or a
professional engineer-in-training.
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb839-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 839 2026
(3) Program funds are derived from the Professional
Regulation Trust Fund. Such funds may be used only to pay the
costs of tuition, books, and living expenses, at an amount not
to exceed $4,000 for each year of study toward the degree
obtained.
(4) From the funds available, the management corporation
may make loan principal repayments of up to $4,000 a year for up
to 4 years on behalf of selected graduates who meet the
requirements of subsection (2), beginning after the selected
graduate's first year of employment. All repayments are
contingent upon continued proof of employment in a designated
state agency or water management district and must be made
directly to the holder of the loan. The state bears no
responsibility for the collection of any interest charges or
other remaining balance. In the event that the designated state
agencies or water management districts change, an engineer
remains eligible for loan assistance as long as he or she
remains employed in the state agency or water management
district for which the original loan payment was made and
continues to meet all other conditions of eligibility.
(5) The board shall adopt rules necessary to administer
the program.
(6) This section shall be implemented only as specifically
funded.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb839-00